Washington statutes.
RCW 35.88.040

Pollution as criminal nuisance—Punishment.

Any person who does, establishes, maintains, or creates any of the things which have the effect of polluting any such sources of water supply, or water, and any person who does any of the things in RCW 35.88.030 declared to be unlawful, shall be deemed guilty of creating and maintaining a nuisance, and may be prosecuted therefor, and upon conviction thereof may be fined in any sum not exceeding five hundred dollars.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.88.040. Prior: 1899 c 70 s 2, part; RRS s 9474, part.]

NOTES:

Nuisance: Chapter 9.66 RCW.